Vermont statutes. Title 20 Internal Security and Public Safety
Chapter 5. Military Aid

§ 151.
Agreements or compacts.

Pursuant to the provisions and authority of Congress, as amended by Pub. L. No. 84-564, 42 U.S.C. §§ 5195a and 5196, the Governor is authorized to enter into, amend, supplement, and implement agreements or compacts with the executive authorities of other states, including the Emergency Management Assistance Compact, providing for mutual-military aid, disaster relief, hazard mitigation, and emergency preparedness and related matters, in case of hazard or natural disaster, invasion or other hostile action, disaster, insurrection, or the imminent danger of such an event.

HISTORY:

Amended

1999, No. 138

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2021, No. 20

, § 128.

§ 152.
Provisions.

Agreements or compacts entered into pursuant to this chapter may include provisions for joint military action against a common enemy; for the protection of bridges, tunnels, ferries, pipelines, communication facilities, and other vital installations, plants, and facilities; for the military support of civil defense agencies; for the fresh pursuit, by the National Guard or other state military forces or any part of such forces, of a signatory into the jurisdiction of any other signatory, of persons acting or appearing to act in the interest of an enemy government, or seeking or appearing to seek to overthrow the government of the United States or of any signatory; for the powers, duties, rights, privileges, and immunities of the members of the National Guard or military forces of any signatory while so engaged outside their own jurisdictions; for other matters of a military nature, or incidental to matters of a military nature that the Governor deems necessary or proper to promote the health, safety, and welfare of the people of this State; for the allocation of all costs and expenses arising from the planning and operation of such agreements or compacts.

HISTORY:

Amended

2021, No. 20

, § 129.

§ 153.
Construction.

Nothing contained in sections 151 and 152 of this title shall be construed as a direct or indirect limitation of the power of the Governor to enter into, and to amend or supplement such compacts, with legal force and effect and without the legislative authorization expressed in this chapter.

HISTORY:

Amended

2021, No. 20

, § 130.

§ 154.
Pursuit by military forces of another state.

Any military forces or organization, unit, or detachment thereof, of another state who are in fresh pursuit of insurrectionists, saboteurs, enemies, or enemy forces may continue such pursuit into this State until the military or police forces of this State or the forces of the United States have had a reasonable opportunity to take up the pursuit or to apprehend or capture such persons and are hereby authorized to arrest or capture such persons within this State while in fresh pursuit.
Any such person who shall be captured or arrested by the military forces of such other state while in this State shall without unnecessary delay be surrendered to the military or police forces of this State to be dealt with according to law.
This section shall not be construed so as to make unlawful any arrest in this State that would otherwise be lawful, and nothing contained in this section shall be deemed to repeal any of the provisions of the Uniform Act on Fresh Pursuit.